California statutes. Education Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17032.

The board shall fix rents for all projects acquired and may change the rents from time to time as may be needed provided the rents shall not in any year exceed the sum of the following:

(a) One dollar ($1).

(b) Any interest earned on funds in the county school lease-purchase fund for the district.

(c) Any unencumbered bond funds of the district, exclusive of funds that are used by the district to fund a project pursuant to Section 17040.2.

(d) The net proceeds from the sale or lease of any school buildings or land no longer needed for school purposes, exclusive of proceeds that are used for capital outlay expenditures for school construction that conforms to building area standards established under this chapter, for revenue purposes under a joint venture as authorized by Section 17032.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17032.3.

(a) Any school district for which one or more projects has been funded under this chapter may, pursuant to written agreement with any other public or private person or entity, utilize any school buildings, land, or other real property interest that the governing board determines is not needed for school purposes, and will not be needed for school purposes within the next 30 years, in a joint venture with that person or entity to generate revenues for school facilities purposes, pursuant to the following conditions:

(1) The district has developed a school district asset utilization plan, setting forth the information required under subdivision (b), which plan has been the subject of a public hearing, and the governing board of the district has made the finding that the implementation of the plan will benefit the district.

(2) Prior to the execution by the school district governing board of any agreement regarding the utilization of the school buildings or land, or both, under a joint venture pursuant to this section, the school district asset utilization plan has been submitted for, and has received, the review and approval of the State Allocation Board. No later than 90 days after the receipt of the plan, the board shall determine whether to approve the plan, which approval shall be granted if the board finds the plan to comply with this section.

(3) Once every three years after the approval of any plan pursuant to paragraph (2), the school district shall update the plan with information regarding the disposition of the revenues received by the district from the utilization of the school buildings or land, or both, under the joint venture, including the effect of those revenues upon the school facility needs for which the district may otherwise be eligible under this chapter or under any other school facilities program administered by the board, together with such other information as the board may require, and shall resubmit the plan to the board for its review and approval. In the event that the board refuses to approve the plan on the basis that the district is no longer in substantial compliance with this section, the surplus school buildings or land, or both, utilized under the joint venture shall no longer be exempt from the rental requirements of Section 17032.

(4) Pursuant to a school district asset utilization plan approved under this section, the school district may utilize school buildings or land, or both, in a joint venture, the revenues from which shall be placed by the district in a separate fund. The principal and interest from that separate fund may be expended by the district only for the following school facilities purposes, as authorized under the approved plan, in accordance with the pupil loading and cost standards established pursuant to this chapter: the acquisition of land, new construction, reconstruction, modernization, rehabilitation, and deferred maintenance.

(b) For purposes of this section, a school district asset utilization plan shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, all of the following:

(1) A specific description of the surplus school buildings or land, or both, to be utilized under the joint venture.

(2) The identification of the current educational uses of the surplus school buildings or land, or both, and of the educational uses proposed under the joint venture.

(3) The identification of the current noneducational uses of the surplus school buildings or land, or both, and of the noneducational uses proposed under the joint venture, and a specific assessment of the compatibility of those uses with any applicable general or specific governmental land use plans and with applicable zoning restrictions.

(4) A description of the prospective economic benefits to be derived by the district from the joint venture.

(5) A description of the prospective educational benefits to be derived by the district from the joint venture.

(6) A comprehensive description of the joint venture, including, but not limited to, a description of the intended means of financing the joint venture.

(7) A plan for the disposition of the revenues received by the district from the joint venture.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17032.5.

(a) The board shall establish the annual rent and conditions to be met by the lessee of a portable classroom leased pursuant to Section 17717.2 and shall require lessees to undertake all necessary maintenance, repairs, renewals, and replacements to ensure that a project is at all times kept in good repair, working order, and condition. All costs incurred for this purpose shall be borne by the lessee.

(b) For purposes of this section, “good repair” has the same meaning as specified in subdivision (d) of Section 17002.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 900, Sec. 5.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

17033.

Rent, charges, and fees collected in error may be refunded by the board in accordance with regulations prescribed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17034.

A county school lease-purchase fund is hereby created in the county treasury within each county for each school district project in the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17035.

The board may from time to time authorize the Controller to transfer any funds that the board may deem necessary from the State School Building Lease-Purchase Fund established for a given project to the corresponding county school lease-purchase fund in the county treasury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17036.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), funds may be expended from the county school lease-purchase fund by the applicant school district only when specifically authorized by the board for either direct project costs or reimbursements.

(b) Upon specific authorization by the board, applicant school districts may be reimbursed from the county school lease-purchase fund for expenditures, or commitments therefor, made prior to the approval of a project by the board, subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) The expenditures or commitments were made in accordance with the terms of the approval of a project.

(2) The expenditures or commitments were made not more than four years prior to the approval of a project.

(3) The expenditures or commitments do not include any cost incurred for construction of a project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17037.

Any remaining funds, including any interest earned on those funds, in a county school lease-purchase fund for a school district that remains in the fund on and after January 1, 2026, shall not be reported or returned to the state and may be used by the school district for capital outlay expenditures for school construction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 8, Sec. 12.   (AB 121)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17038.

The board shall require school districts to insure at their own expense for the benefit of the state, all sites, equipment and buildings which are, under Section 17030, the property of the state, against such risks and in such amounts as the board may deem necessary to protect the interests of the state. No project funds shall be used to pay the premiums on such insurance. All payments resulting from claims made against said insurance shall be made payable to and retained by the board. Funds so received shall be utilized by the board for repair or replacement of the facilities for which claim was made. In no event may the amounts expended from such funds for such repair or replacement exceed the payments received.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17039.

(a) Not more than one hundred fifty million dollars ($150,000,000) of the moneys authorized by the State School Building Lease-Purchase Bond Law of 1982 (Sec. 34, Ch. 552, Stats. 1995) shall be reserved for the reconstruction or modernization of facilities within the meaning of this chapter.

(b) For purposes of this section, the State Allocation Board shall establish a separate priority system which shall be based on the following factors and any other factors which the board determines are appropriate:

(1) Structural condition and age of the building.

(2) Percentage of pupils affected in the district or attendance area.

(3) Degree of utilization of eligible buildings.

(4) Other building code deficiencies, such as health, safety, or electrical problems.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17039.1.

Not more than two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) of the moneys authorized by the State School Building Lease-Purchase Bond Law of 1982 (Sec. 34, Ch. 552, Stats. 1995) shall be reserved for the reconstruction or modernization of facilities within the meaning of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17039.2.

Of the moneys reserved for the rehabilitation or modernization of facilities pursuant to Section 17039.1, the board may reserve not more than twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) for apportionments to school districts that the board has determined to be in severe need of the apportionment. In addition, of the moneys reserved for the reconstruction or modernization of facilities pursuant to Section 17696.96 of the Greene-Hughes School Building Lease-Purchase Bond Law of 1986 (Sec. 34, Ch. 552, Stats. 1995), the board may reserve up to and including 10 percent for this purpose. In either event, the apportionment shall be for purposes of site acquisition and the construction of school facilities for schoolsites that meet one or more of the conditions established by the board, which shall include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) The schoolsite is not less than 30 years of age.

(b) The schoolsite has accommodated a significant increase in enrollment during the last 10-year period.

(c) Enrollment increases have been accommodated by placing relocatable structures on the schoolsite without expanding the schoolsite.

(d) The schoolsite has inadequate playground space for its enrollment.

(e) The schoolsite has inadequate meal facilities, and those facilities are used for more than three times the number of pupils for which the facilities were originally designed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Allowances [17040. - 17052.]

17040.

Except as provided in Section 17041, no project shall be approved, the building area of which, when added to the area of adequate school construction existing in the applicant school district at the time of application, will provide a total area of school building construction per unit of estimated average daily attendance in excess of that computed in accordance with Sections 17043, 17044, 17045, and 17046.

As used in Sections 17041.5, 17043, 17044, 17045, and 17046, “maximum area” means maximum area of school building
 construction and “attendance unit” means unit of estimated average daily attendance.

As used in this section and Sections 17045 and 17046, “attendance center” means a school maintained or to be maintained at a given location within a district. Enrollment projections shall be made for the third fiscal year beyond the fiscal year in which the application is made for a project for kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 6, inclusive, and for the fourth fiscal year beyond the fiscal year in which the application is made for a junior high school or high school project. Except as otherwise provided by the board, the estimates of average daily attendance shall be based upon the number of family dwellings and mobilehome parks, as defined in Section 18214 of the Health and Safety Code, under construction or newly constructed and never occupied in the district and the number of children residing in the district. In no case shall an estimate be given effect unless approved by the
 board.

For the purposes of this chapter, pupils attending grades 7 and 8 in an elementary district, but residing in a high school district that maintains one or more junior high schools, shall not be considered in determining or estimating the average daily attendance of the elementary district, unless one of the following conditions is met:

(a) The elementary district is maintaining and has continuously maintained grades 7 and 8 since a date prior to January 1, 1975.

(b) The elementary district, by a vote of the electorate at an election held on June 2, 1981, withdrew its 7th and 8th grade pupils from the high school district.

(c) The elementary district, by a vote of the electorate at an election held on November 4, 1980, withdrew its 7th and 8th grade pupils from the high
 school district and the high school district continues to qualify for a project, other than a project pursuant to Section 17041, on the basis of the remaining 7th and 8th grade pupils. In no event shall a facility be constructed for the withdrawn 7th and 8th grade pupils at a distance less than one and one-half miles from the nearest proposed or existing junior high facility.

When these pupils are so considered in determining or estimating the average daily attendance of the elementary district, they shall not be considered in determining or estimating average daily attendance of the high school district for junior high school purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17040.1.

(a) The allowable building area of any project, as calculated under this article, may be increased by any applicant school district, where the increase is funded exclusively from sources other than any state programs administered by the State Allocation Board. Any increase in building area pursuant to this section in a project for which construction commenced on or after January 1, 1987, not to exceed 110 percent of the area that would be allowed under applicable state standards, shall be excluded from the calculation of the area of adequate
 school construction for the purposes of all subsequent project applications by the district under this chapter.

(b) The maximum building cost permitted for any project under this article may be increased, by not more than 10 percent, by any applicant school district, where the increase is funded by the district exclusively from the proceeds of a general obligation bond measure approved by the voters of the district or of a special tax pursuant to the formation of a community facilities district under Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 53311) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, or both. In order to qualify for this purpose, any tax or other charge authorized pursuant to that approval or formation, respectively, shall apply uniformly to all taxpayers or all real property within the school district, rather than to a particular class of property or taxpayers, and shall require that the amount of the school facilities fee or
 other requirement that may be levied by the school district pursuant to Section 17620, in addition to that tax or other charge, not exceed the amount deemed by the governing board to be necessary for the interim school facilities needs of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17040.2.

Where 75 percent or more of the total cost of a project approved under this chapter is to be funded by the applicant district from sources other than any state program administered by the board, the area of the allowable new building construction for that project, and the amount of the building cost allowed for that project under this chapter, shall each be increased by 5 percent, plus 1 percent for each 1 percent by which that local contribution exceeds 75 percent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17040.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, the estimate of average daily attendance for an applicant school district shall be calculated for up to and including two years longer than the period of time permitted by Section 17040, as requested by the district, where 50 percent or more of the cost of the project is provided by the district from funding sources other than any state program administered by the board. For the purposes of any subsequent project application from that district based upon additional growth in pupil
 enrollment, the estimate of average daily attendance shall be based on enrollment projections for any period of time, as requested by the district, up to and including that permitted by Section 17040.

(b) The project shall be “fast tracked.” For purposes of this section, “fast tracking” means that the total amount of project funding eligibility shall be established upon the board’s approval of the project, which shall be subsequently disbursed as necessary for the development and construction of the project without the prerequisite of any additional state certification or other state-conducted review of project eligibility. Based upon the results of an audit to be conducted upon completion of the project, the board or the applicant district, as appropriate, shall pay to the other any amount that is necessary to conform to the allocation of project costs determined upon the board’s approval of the project.

In the event that the applicant district has not executed all contractual agreements necessary for the complete construction of the project within a period of 18 months following the board’s approval of the project, this subdivision shall cease to apply to the project with regard to any state funding of the project not yet disbursed. Upon request of the applicant district and approval by the board, this 18-month period may be extended for an additional period of up to six months to account for one or more delays resulting from circumstances beyond the district’s control.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17040.4.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, the board may use, for purposes of determining the estimate of average daily attendance for an applicant school district, a master plan that has been prepared by a district that includes the additional pupils due to increases in housing units within the boundaries of the district or attendance area. Before a master plan may be used, both of the following conditions shall be satisfied:

(a) The city, county, or city and county has obtained approval of a
 local general obligation bond or has obtained funds pursuant to the Mello-Roos Community Facilities Act of 1982, as set forth by Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 53311) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, to provide local matching funds for school facility projects for which approval is being sought pursuant to this section.

(b) At least 60 percent of the total cost of the project for which approval is being sought shall be provided by funding sources other than any state program administered by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17040.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the board shall exclude the area of enclosed stairs and appropriate landings for each floor level served from the computation of the allowable building area of multistory buildings for any applicant school district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17040.6.

(a) For any school of two or more stories, the project funding provided under this chapter shall include, at the request of the applicant district, the costs of any or all of the following:

(1) Compliance with applicable requirements of law for fire safety, and for handicapped access, as a result of the multistory design.

(2) Playground apparatus.

(3) Duct shafts, utility tunnels, and pipe conduit chases.

(4) Security items required as a result of the multistory design.

(b) In calculating the maximum project funding that may be allocated for parking, landscaping, and other general schoolsite improvements, which calculation is determined in proportion to the total building cost or area approved for funding under the project, the total building cost or area approved for funding under the project shall be computed by the board to include any increase in project building area, as authorized under Section 17041.8. The applicant district shall provide the board information on how the supplemental project funding will be allocated to relieve the effects resulting from less than the specified land area for the schoolsite.

(c) This section shall apply to
 any application for project funding under this chapter for which the final apportionment for construction of the project had not been made on or prior to December 1, 1987.

(d) For any project approved under this chapter, the amount of project funding granted by the board shall include the actual and reasonable costs incurred by any applicant district for the revision of its project application for the purpose of qualifying for supplemental project funding as authorized by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17040.7.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the board shall provide that building area for enclosed hallways in the second or higher story of any building shall be counted as two-thirds of the actual area. For purposes of this section “enclosed hallways” includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Covered passages, arcades, shelters, porches, and planting areas.

(b) Enclosed covered areas that provide shelter
 between buildings that are 20 feet or more apart.

(c) Sun control devices designed and located to function in lieu of covered walks or other shelters.

(d) Mezzanines used for storage purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17040.8.

Where an applicant district that is eligible under this chapter for project funding of new construction of school facilities on an existing schoolsite, which site has less than 50 percent of the land recommended under State Department of Education guidelines, as published in the School Site Analysis and Development Handbook in effect on January 1, 1987, the area of allowable new building construction for that project shall be increased by the square footage of any existing one-story school facility or facilities to be replaced under the project by one or more
 multistory school facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17040.9.

(a) (1) The board shall allocate the amount calculated under subdivision (b), in addition to any other project funding authorized under this chapter, to each project funded under this chapter for which the resulting pupil density will exceed the following:

(A) For a project for kindergarten or any of the grades 1 to 6, inclusive, 90 pupils per acre.

(B) For a project for a junior high school
 project, 80 pupils per acre.

(C) For a project for a senior high school project, 70 pupils per acre.

(2) For any new construction project, pupil density shall be computed, for purposes of paragraph (1), by dividing the number of units of estimated average daily attendance for the project, including those to be served by relocatable structures, by the acreage of the project site.

(3) For any project for the construction of additional facility space on an existing schoolsite or on land acquired that is adjacent to an existing schoolsite, pupil density shall be computed, for purposes of paragraph (1), by adding the number of units of estimated average daily attendance for the project to the number of units of average daily attendance for the existing school facilities, and dividing that sum by the total site acreage for
 the project and the existing school facilities.

(b) The supplemental project funding authorized under this section shall be calculated by dividing the actual pupil density for the project, as calculated under subdivision (a), by the threshold pupil density for the project as set forth in that subdivision, and multiplying the resulting fraction by an amount equal to the average cost per acre of the land approved for acquisition by the board under this chapter for the project, or that would have been approved for acquisition if the applicant school district had not had an existing schoolsite available for the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17041.

Whenever the area of adequate school construction existing in any attendance area is such as to prevent another attendance area from receiving the maximum area of school construction for each unit of attendance as specified for the district as a whole, the allowable building area may be computed separately for each attendance area. For the purposes of this section and Section 17041.5, an “attendance area” is defined as the geographical area serving an existing or proposed high school and those junior high schools and elementary schools included
 therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17041.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the following determinations shall be made by a self-certifying district, in the manner specified in this chapter and in accordance with the standards governing those determinations that are adopted by the board, for the purpose of calculating the district’s eligibility for project funding under this chapter:

(1) The total allowable building area for which the district is eligible for project funding under this chapter.
 

(2) The district’s area of existing adequate school construction, including, but not limited to, the conducting of field inspections for this purpose. 

If requested by the applicant district, the board shall provide assistance to the district in preparing the necessary documents for self-certification pursuant to this chapter. 

(b) The area determinations made by a self-certifying district pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be certified by the district in its application for project funding and shall be used by the board as the basis for project funding eligibility, except to the extent of any information that the board finds is demonstrated, pursuant to the information certified and any other documentation available to the board from prior project funding applications for that district, to be materially inaccurate, regardless of whether
 the inaccuracy was intended. No later than 30 calendar days after receipt of the determinations certified pursuant to subdivision (a), the board shall notify the district of any inaccuracies identified under this subdivision. 

(c) Each self-certifying district shall maintain documentation of the determinations described in subdivision (a) as required by the board. Those determinations shall be subject to subsequent audit as the board may direct. 

(d) All estimates of average daily attendance for a self-certifying district for the purposes of this article shall be made by the district in accordance with the standards governing those estimates that are adopted by the board. Each determination made by a self-certifying district pursuant to this subdivision shall be reviewed for accuracy by the board or by the county office of education in the county in which the district is located.
 In the event that the review is performed by the board, that review shall be completed no later than 45 calendar days subsequent to the board’s receipt from the district of all documentation necessary for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17041.2.

(a) The State Allocation Board shall conduct random audits of the information certified by self-certifying districts pursuant to this chapter, except as to any determinations that are made under subdivision (d) of Section 17041.1 or that are subject to audit by the State Department of Education pursuant to Section 17024, using generally accepted auditing principles, at any time to ensure compliance with the law.

(b) If any information submitted by a self-certifying district in
 its certification of funding eligibility for any project is found by the board to contain any material inaccuracy, any building area constructed as a result, in excess of the building area to which the district was entitled for purposes of that project, shall be included in the calculation of the area of adequate school construction for the purposes of all subsequent project applications by the district under this chapter. In addition, the board shall impose both of the following penalties:

(1) Pursuant to a repayment schedule approved by the board, the district shall repay to the board of no more than five years, for deposit in the State School Building Lease-Purchase Fund, an amount equal to the amount of project funding allocated under this chapter to construct that excess building area, together with interest at the rate paid on moneys in the Pooled Money Investment Account or at the highest rate of interest for the most recent issue of
 state general obligation bonds as established pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, whichever is greater. The amount of any repayment owing under this paragraph for any fiscal year, which is not repaid otherwise by the district, shall be withheld by the board from any project funding that otherwise would be allocated to that district under this chapter in that fiscal year. As to any repayment obligation remaining for that fiscal year, the board shall notify the Superintendent of Public Instruction, who shall withhold the amount of that remaining obligation from the apportionments to be made to the district from the State School Fund in that fiscal year. 

(2) The information that otherwise may be certified under this chapter by a self-certifying district shall be made by the board under any subsequent applications for project funding, rather than by the applicant
 district, for a period of up to five years following the date of the finding of a material inaccuracy, or until the district’s repayment of the entire amount owing under paragraph (1), whichever occurs later. 

(c) Any school district against which the board imposes the penalties under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b) may submit for binding determination by an arbitrator the issue of whether the penalties imposed are disproportionate to the inaccuracy certified by the district. Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, the procedure governing the arbitration shall be as set forth in Title 9 (commencing with Section 1280) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure. 

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that audits as described in this section not interfere with the application and construction process under this chapter unless one or more violations are
 discovered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17041.3.

For the purposes of Sections 17041 and 17041.5, allowable building area may be computed, in the alternative to the methods prescribed by Section 17041, for any combination of two or more adjacent high school attendance areas pursuant to the following conditions:

(a) The project to be funded is for the construction of a high school, junior high school, or elementary school located or to be located in any of those high school attendance areas.

(b) The high school, junior high school, or elementary school to be constructed is to serve pupils residing in each of those high school attendance areas.

(c) The combined computation of allowable building area reflects the allowable building area to which each of the high school attendance areas would otherwise be entitled, reflecting the proportion of projected pupil enrollment in the school to be constructed, as calculated under this chapter, from each of those attendance areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17041.5.

(a) Whenever the area of adequate school construction existing in an attendance area is less than the maximum area computed for that attendance area, any portion of the remaining computed allowable building area may be used for the construction of district administration and maintenance facilities.

(b) If the allowable building area is computed separately by attendance area, the board shall include within the computation of the maximum area for that attendance area the proposed
 building area of a project for the construction of district administration and maintenance facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17041.6.

The board shall, in allocating funds for school facilities construction pursuant to this chapter, give first priority to applicant districts proposing additional classrooms within their maximum allowable building area before allocating funds to applicant districts proposing administration and maintenance facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17041.8.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any applicant school district that receives supplemental project funding under Sections 17040.6, 17040.7, 17040.8, and 17041.8 shall apply that funding to the purposes of the project funded, in compliance with any requirements set forth in those sections, but need not comply in that regard with the allowable building area of that project as otherwise calculated under this chapter. The expenditure of the supplemental project funds authorized under those sections is exempt from the total building
 cost standards applicable to the project. In addition, the increase in building area authorized under this subdivision is exempt, for purposes of any subsequent application for project funding under this chapter, from the calculation of existing adequate school construction of the district.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the total amount of supplemental project funding that an applicant district is entitled to receive under Sections 17040.6, 17040.7, 17040.8, and 17040.9 may not exceed the lesser of the following:

(1) An amount equal to that calculated under subdivision (b) of Section 17040.9.

(2) An amount equal to the sum of four thousand dollars ($4,000) for each of the first 500 units of estimated average daily attendance for the project, and two thousand dollars ($2,000) for each additional unit
 of estimated average daily attendance. The monetary rates set forth in this paragraph shall be increased annually for inflation for the prior calendar year on the basis of the cost index for class B construction as determined in the January meeting of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17042.

(a) The board, by the adoption of rules, shall provide for the manner of determining the area of adequate school construction existing in an applicant school district at the time of application. Those rules shall define and provide for the method of determining building areas that are to be included in, in whole or in part, or to be excluded from, the area of existing adequate school construction. Any building to which Article 3 (commencing with Section 39140) of Chapter 1 of Part 23 of Division 3 of Title 2 does not apply shall not be
 considered adequate school construction for the purpose of determining the maximum total building area per attendance unit.

The board may make exceptions to the provisions of this section, or to the rules adopted pursuant thereto, if it determines that the exception or exceptions will be for the benefit of pupils affected.

(b) For the purposes of this chapter, the area of adequate school construction existing in an applicant school district does not include any of the following:

(1) Any portable classroom made available to the district under Chapter 25 (commencing with Section 17785).

(2) In any school operated on a year-round schedule, any building area that has been in continuous use during the preceding five-year period primarily for the operation of any preschool program
 or programs.
